Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1956
Child care and early childhood education
program; rating; quality rating criteria.

(1) Each applicable child care and early
childhood education program which applies under section 71-1957 to participate
in the quality rating and improvement system developed pursuant to section
71-1955 shall be rated on a quality scale using ratings labeled steps one
through five and based on quality rating criteria.

(2) Quality
rating criteria shall be used to assign a quality scale rating as appropriate
for the specific step. The criteria shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) Licensing
requirements as specified in the Child Care Licensing Act;

(b) Facility
safety and management;

(c) Child development and school readiness outcomes;

(d) Program
curriculum, learning environment, and adult-child interactions;

(e) Professional
development and training;

(f) Family engagement;

(g) Program administration;

(h) Standards
used by nationally recognized accrediting bodies approved by the State Department
of Education; and

(i) Other standards as required by the State Department of Education
for prekindergarten services and prekindergarten programs established pursuant
to section 79-1104 and federal performance standards for Head Start and Early
Head Start programs.

Laws 2013, LB507, § 5.
September 6, 2013
Child Care Licensing Act, see section 71-1908.